Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB526.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of July 8, 2007 (P.L.90, No.28), known as the Freedom to Breastfeed Act, is amended by adding sections to read:Section 2.1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:<--<--<--1234567891011121314151617181920 "Breastfeeding." The process of feeding human milk to a child, either directly from the breast or by expressing milk from the breast and bottle-feeding the milk to the child.Section 5. Private right of action.An individual whose freedom to breastfeed as provided in this act has been denied, interfered with or otherwise restricted or who has experienced retaliation for exercising the freedom to breastfeed under this act may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction within two years of the violation to:(1) enjoin future denials, interference and restriction;(2) recover statutory damages of $1,000 per violation;(3) recover reasonable attorney fees and litigation expenses; or(4) recover any other equitable relief as the court may determine appropriate to remedy the violation.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.SECTION 1. TITLE 35 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES IS AMENDED BY ADDING A CHAPTER TO READ:CHAPTER 58AFREEDOM TO BREASTFEEDSEC.58A01. SCOPE OF CHAPTER.58A02. DECLARATION OF POLICY.58A02.1. DEFINITIONS.58A03. GENERAL RULE.58A04. FREEDOM TO BREASTFEED.58A05. PRIVATE RIGHT OF ACTION.§ 58A01. SCOPE OF CHAPTER.THIS CHAPTER RELATES TO THE FREEDOM TO BREASTFEED.§ 58A02. DECLARATION OF POLICY.20250HB0526PN1718 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS THAT BREASTFEEDING A BABY IS AN IMPORTANT AND BASIC ACT OF NURTURING THAT MUST BE PROTECTED IN THE INTERESTS OF MATERNAL AND CHILD HEALTH AND FAMILY VALUES.§ 58A02.1. DEFINITIONS.THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS CHAPTER SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"BREASTFEEDING." THE PROCESS OF FEEDING HUMAN MILK TO A CHILD, EITHER DIRECTLY FROM THE BREAST OR BY EXPRESSING MILK FROM THE BREAST AND BOTTLE-FEEDING THE MILK TO THE CHILD.§ 58A03. GENERAL RULE.A MOTHER SHALL BE PERMITTED TO BREASTFEED HER CHILD IN ANY LOCATION, PUBLIC OR PRIVATE, WHERE THE MOTHER AND CHILD ARE OTHERWISE AUTHORIZED TO BE PRESENT, IRRESPECTIVE OF WHETHER OR NOT THE MOTHER'S BREAST IS COVERED DURING OR INCIDENTAL TO THE BREASTFEEDING.§ 58A04. FREEDOM TO BREASTFEED.THE ACT OF BREASTFEEDING SHALL NOT BE CONSIDERED:(1) INDECENT EXPOSURE AS DEFINED IN 18 PA.C.S. § 3127 (RELATING TO INDECENT EXPOSURE).(2) OPEN LEWDNESS AS DEFINED IN 18 PA.C.S. § 5901 (RELATING TO OPEN LEWDNESS).(3) OBSCENITY OR SEXUAL CONDUCT AS DEFINED IN 18 PA.C.S. § 5903 (RELATING TO OBSCENE AND OTHER SEXUAL MATERIALS AND PERFORMANCES).(4) A NUISANCE AS DEFINED IN 18 PA.C.S. § 6504 (RELATING TO PUBLIC NUISANCES).§ 58A05. PRIVATE RIGHT OF ACTION.AN INDIVIDUAL WHOSE FREEDOM TO BREASTFEED AS PROVIDED IN THIS CHAPTER HAS BEEN DENIED, INTERFERED WITH OR OTHERWISE RESTRICTED 20250HB0526PN1718 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OR WHO HAS EXPERIENCED RETALIATION FOR EXERCISING THE FREEDOM TO BREASTFEED UNDER THIS ACT MAY BRING AN ACTION IN A COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION WITHIN TWO YEARS OF THE VIOLATION TO:(1) ENJOIN FUTURE DENIALS, INTERFERENCE AND RESTRICTION;(2) RECOVER STATUTORY DAMAGES OF $1,000 PER VIOLATION;(3) RECOVER REASONABLE ATTORNEY FEES AND LITIGATION EXPENSES; OR(4) RECOVER ANY OTHER EQUITABLE RELIEF AS THE COURT MAY DETERMINE APPROPRIATE TO REMEDY THE VIOLATION.SECTION 2. REPEALS ARE AS FOLLOWS:(1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY DECLARES THAT THE REPEAL UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) IS NECESSARY TO EFFECTUATE THE ADDITION OF 35 PA.C.S. CH. 58A.(2) THE ACT OF JULY 8, 2007 (P.L.90, NO.28), KNOWN AS THE FREEDOM TO BREASTFEED ACT, IS REPEALED.SECTION 3. THE ADDITION OF 35 PA.C.S. CH. 58A IS A CONTINUATION OF THE ACT OF JULY 8, 2007 (P.L.90, NO.28), KNOWN AS THE FREEDOM TO BREASTFEED ACT. THE FOLLOWING APPLY:(1) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN 35 PA.C.S. CH. 58A, ALL ACTIVITIES INITIATED UNDER THE FREEDOM TO BREASTFEED ACT SHALL CONTINUE AND REMAIN IN FULL FORCE AND EFFECT AND MAY BE COMPLETED UNDER 35 PA.C.S. CH. 58A. ORDERS, REGULATIONS, RULES AND DECISIONS WHICH WERE MADE UNDER THE FREEDOM TO BREASTFEED ACT AND WHICH ARE IN EFFECT ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF SECTION 2(2) OF THIS ACT SHALL REMAIN IN FULL FORCE AND EFFECT UNTIL REVOKED, VACATED OR MODIFIED UNDER 35 PA.C.S. CH. 58A. CONTRACTS, OBLIGATIONS AND COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS ENTERED INTO UNDER THE FREEDOM TO BREASTFEED ACT ARE NOT AFFECTED NOR IMPAIRED BY THE REPEAL OF THE FREEDOM TO BREASTFEED ACT.20250HB0526PN1718 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) EXCEPT AS SET FORTH IN PARAGRAPH (3), ANY DIFFERENCE IN LANGUAGE BETWEEN 35 PA.C.S. CH. 58A AND THE FREEDOM TO BREASTFEED ACT IS INTENDED ONLY TO CONFORM TO THE STYLE OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES AND IS NOT INTENDED TO CHANGE OR AFFECT THE LEGISLATIVE INTENT, JUDICIAL CONSTRUCTION OR ADMINISTRATION AND IMPLEMENTATION OF THE FREEDOM TO BREASTFEED ACT.(3) PARAGRAPH (2) DOES NOT APPLY TO THE ADDITION OF THE FOLLOWING PROVISIONS:(I) 35 PA.C.S. § 58A02.1.(II) 35 PA.C.S. § 58A05.SECTION 4. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 60 DAYS.20250HB0526PN1718 - 5 - 123456789101112